Hawaii statutes.
[§90D-8]
Staff. The commission may establish and fill the following positions:

(1) One executive
director;

(2) One senior
program officer;

(3) Two program
officers;

(4) One
accountant; and

(5) One
secretary.

The commission
may hire additional staff to assist in the performance of its duties and
responsibilities. The staff of the commission shall be hired without regard to
chapter 76; provided that staff shall be eligible for participation in state
employee benefit plans. [L 2002, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next